Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2908
Articles and bylaws; approval or disapproval; procedure.

(1) Within sixty days after the articles and bylaws are filed with the Director of Insurance pursuant to section 44-2906, the director shall make a determination whether the filed documents meet the requirements of sections 44-2901 to 44-2918. Such determination shall be communicated in writing to the organizers of the association.

(2) If the documents so filed are deficient, the director's written findings shall state specifically on what grounds he is disapproving them. The organizers may thereafter amend and refile the articles and bylaws, which amended filing the Director of Insurance shall approve or disapprove within sixty days.

Laws 1976, LB 809, § 8.